New York, session 2025-2026, A11519.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 473 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. (a) Each social services district shall ensure that all adult 4 protective services workers receive training and education appropriate 5 to the performance of their duties. 6 (b) Such training shall include, but not be limited to, instruction on 7 Alzheimer's disease and related dementias, including but not limited to 8 the recognition of symptoms, communication techniques, assessment of 9 capacity, and the identification of abuse, neglect, and exploitation of 10 individuals with cognitive impairment. 11 (c) Each adult protective services worker shall complete: 12 (i) not less than six hours of dementia-specific training upon 13 commencement of employment or within six months thereafter; and 14 (ii) not less than three hours of ongoing training thereafter, as 15 prescribed by the commissioner, provided that such training is completed 16 at least once every two years. 17 (d) The commissioner of the office of temporary and disability assist- 18 ance, in consultation with the office for the aging, shall: 19 (i) develop or approve training curricula and standards; 20 (ii) establish guidelines for the frequency and content of continuing 21 education; and 22 (iii) provide technical assistance to social services districts to 23 ensure compliance. 24 (e) Each social services district shall: 25 (i) ensure compliance with the training requirements of this subdivi- 26 sion; 27 (ii) maintain records of completion for all adult protective services 28 workers; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15972-01-6 A. 11519 2 1 (iii) certify, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, that such 2 requirements have been satisfied. 3 § 2. The commissioner of the office of children and family services is 4 authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to imple- 5 ment the provisions of this act. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 7 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 8 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 9 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 10 completed on or before such effective date.